Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.042

Health information—Processes, guidelines, and standards.

By December 1, 2011, the lead organization shall, consistent with the federal health insurance portability and accountability act, develop processes, guidelines, and standards that address:

(1) Identification and prioritization of high value health data from health data providers. High value health data include:

(a) Prescriptions;

(b) Immunization records;

(c) Laboratory results;

(d) Allergies; and

(e) Diagnostic imaging;

(2) Processes to request, submit, and receive data;

(3) Data security, including:

(a) Storage, access, encryption, and password protection;

(b) Secure methods for accepting and responding to requests for data;

(c) Handling unauthorized access to or disclosure of individually identifiable patient health information, including penalties for unauthorized disclosure; and

(d) Authentication of individuals, including patients and providers, when requesting access to health information, and maintenance of a permanent audit trail of such requests, including:

(i) Identification of the party making the request;

(ii) The data elements reported; and

(iii) Transaction dates;

(4) Materials written in plain language that explain the exchange of health information and how patients can effectively manage such information, including the use of online tools for that purpose;

(5) Materials for health care providers that explain the exchange of health information and the secure management of such information.

[ 2009 c 300 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—2009 c 300: See note following RCW 41.05.036.